Louisiana, session 2026, HB1071.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:3.7 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3.7. Aerospace facility and activity records
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, blueprints,
plans, designs, technical data, operational documents, security information, and any
other records related to the design, operation, flights, transportation, or security of
critical infrastructure of aerospace facilities or aerospace activity shall be
confidential if either of the following applies to the entity with custody of the
records:
(1) The entity maintains information subject to the International Traffic in
Arms Regulations (ITAR) (22 CFR Parts 120 through 130).
(2) The entity holds a current contract with the United States Department of
Defense or any agency within the United States intelligence community.
B. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to require the inspection,
examination, copying, or reproduction of any record made confidential pursuant to
this Section.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1071 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.